Wyoming statutes. Title 7 Criminal Procedure
Article 3. Mental Illness or Deficiency
§ 7-11-304.
Responsibility for criminal conduct; plea; examination; commitment; use of statements by defendant.

A person is not responsible for criminal conduct if at the time of the criminal conduct, as a result of mental illness or deficiency, he lacked substantial capacity either to appreciate the wrongfulness of his conduct or to conform his conduct to the requirements of law. As used in this section, the terms mental illness or deficiency mean only those severely abnormal mental conditions that grossly and demonstrably impair a person’s perception or understanding of reality and that are not attributable primarily to self-induced intoxication as defined by W.S. 6-1-202(b).

As used in this section, the terms “mental illness or deficiency” do not include an abnormality manifested only by repeated criminal or otherwise antisocial conduct.

Evidence that a person is not responsible for criminal conduct by reason of mental illness or deficiency is not admissible at the trial of the defendant unless a plea of “not guilty by reason of mental illness or deficiency” is made. A plea of “not guilty by reason of mental illness or deficiency” may be pleaded orally or in writing by the defendant or his counsel at the time of his arraignment. The court, for good cause shown, may also allow that plea to be entered at a later time. Such a plea does not deprive the defendant of other defenses.

In all cases where a plea of “not guilty by reason of mental illness or deficiency” is made, the court shall order an examination of the defendant by a designated examiner. The order may include, but is not limited to, an examination of the defendant at the Wyoming state hospital on an inpatient or outpatient basis, at a local mental health center on an inpatient or outpatient basis, or at his place of detention. In selecting the examination site, the court may consider proximity to the court, availability of an examiner and the necessity for security precautions. If the order provides for commitment of the defendant to a designated facility, the commitment shall continue no longer than a forty-five (45) day period for the observation and evaluation of the mental condition of the defendant, which time may be extended by the approval of the court.

If an examination of a defendant’s fitness to proceed has been ordered pursuant to W.S.

7-11-303

, an examination following a plea of “not guilty by reason of mental illness or deficiency” shall not occur, or be ordered, until the court has found the defendant is competent to proceed under W.S.

7-11-303

.

A written report of the examination shall be filed with the clerk of court. The report shall include:

Detailed findings, including, but not limited to, the data and reasoning that link the opinions specified in paragraphs (ii) and (iii) of this subsection;

An opinion as to whether the defendant has a mental illness or deficiency;

An opinion as to whether at the time of the alleged criminal conduct the defendant, as a result of mental illness or deficiency, lacked substantial capacity to appreciate the wrongfulness of his conduct or to conform his conduct to the requirements of law.

The clerk of court shall deliver copies of the report to the district attorney and to the defendant or his counsel. The report shall not be a public record or open to the public. If an examination provided under subsection (d) of this section was conducted, the report may be received in evidence and no new examination shall be required unless requested under this subsection. Within five (5) days after receiving a copy of the report, the defendant or the state, upon written request, may obtain an order granting an examination of the defendant by a designated examiner chosen by the requester of the examination.

Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, no statement made by the defendant in the course of any examination or treatment pursuant to this section and no information received by any person in the course thereof is admissible in evidence in any criminal proceeding on any issue other than that of the mental condition of the defendant. If the defendant testifies in his own behalf, any statement made by him in the course of any examination or treatment pursuant to this section may be admitted:

For impeachment purposes; or

As evidence in a criminal prosecution for perjury.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 191, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 7-242.4; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; 1983, ch. 179, § 1; 1985, ch. 147, § 2; 2009, ch. 31, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to perjury, see §

6-5-301

.

As to pleas, see Rule 11, W.R. Cr. P.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, rewrote (d) and (e) to clarify procedures for mental evaluations in criminal cases; added (f) and (g); and redesignated former (f) as (h).

Editor's note. —

Any pre-1975 annotations are taken from cases decided under prior law.

Defendant prejudiced by application of wrong versions of statutes.—

The defendant, who committed certain offenses prior to July 1, 1983, was, nevertheless, tried under this section and §

7-11-305

, relating to mental illness or deficiency, as they existed after their 1983 amendments, effective July 1, 1983. The defendant's psychiatric witness testified that the defendant could not resist his impulses at the time of the incidents in question, which was sufficient, under the pre-1983 version of subsection (a), to relieve a person of responsibility for criminal conduct. The defendant was prejudiced by the court's failing to give an instruction under pre-1983 §

7-11-305

(b), under which the state had the obligation to prove beyond a reasonable doubt that the defendant was able to “conform his conduct to the requirements of the law,” as defined in pre-1983 § 7-11-304(a), and by, instead, giving an instruction under post-1983 § 7-11-305(b), under which the burden was shifted to the defendant to prove that he could not “conform his conduct to the conduct of the law,” as now defined in subsection (a) to exclude the “irresistible impulse” test. Lewis v. State, 709 P.2d 1278,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 619

(Wyo. 1985).

“Irresistible-impulse” test not accepted in Wyoming. —

The “irresistible-impulse” test has been accepted in a number of jurisdictions as a standard to determine criminal responsibility. However, it is inconsistent on its face with the standard set forth in the Model Penal Code and in §§

7-11-301

and

7-11-304

.Dean v. State, 668 P.2d 639,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 354

(Wyo. 1983).

Neither is “diminished capacity” defense. —

The mental element necessary for the commission of a crime has now been established by the legislature. If the legislature had intended additional defenses, such as “diminished capacity,” it would have said so. Dean v. State, 668 P.2d 639,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 354

(Wyo. 1983).

Mental disorders, by themselves, insufficient. —

A showing that defendant was suffering from bipolar affective disorder, schizoaffective disorder and other maladies was insufficient to excuse him from the crime of accessory to first-degree murder, where he did not show that, because of this mental condition, he lacked substantial capacity either to appreciate the wrongfulness of his conduct or to conform his conduct to the requirements of law. Miller v. State, 755 P.2d 855,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 56

(Wyo. 1988), cert. denied, 806 P.2d 1308,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 1991).

Defendant may withdraw guilty plea upon documenting mentalillness or deficiency defense. —

A presentation by the defendant, in connection with his motion for leave to withdraw his plea of guilty, of supporting documentation for the proposition that he has developed reliable evidence sustaining the defense of mental illness or deficiency presents a “plausible reason” and a “fair and just” reason for withdrawing the plea. Schmidt v. State, 668 P.2d 656,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 356

(Wyo. 1983).

Defendant submits to examination by pleading insanity. —

A defendant in a criminal case is not required to plead insanity; but when he does so, by his plea, he submits himself to the examination prescribed by statute and thereby permits the results of such examination to be presented to the court. State v. Spears, 76 Wyo. 82, 300 P.2d 551,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1956).

And defendant's constitutional rights not violated. —

A defendant, who enters a plea of not guilty by reason of temporary insanity and who is committed to the state hospital for an examination while out on bail, is not deprived of any constitutional rights. State v. Spears, 76 Wyo. 82, 300 P.2d 551,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1956).

Defendant's constitutional rights are not violated by a statutory provision calling for the examination of the defendant at the state hospital, either on the ground of self-incrimination or on the ground of lack of due process. State v. Riggle, 76 Wyo. 1, 298 P.2d 349,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1956).

Defendant who is committed to state hospital for examination and observation as to his sanity pursuant to statute is not deprived of any rights when he is taken to a doctor in another state for the purpose of having an electroencephalogram taken, where such is not available in Wyoming. State v. Riggle, 76 Wyo. 1, 298 P.2d 349,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1956).

Defendant underwent a mental evaluation which concluded he was competent, and he did not contest the results of the evaluation or request an additional evaluation; after the evaluation was completed, there was no new evidence suggesting defendant's capacity had diminished. Thus, the district court complied with the mental examination requirements set out in the statutes, and defendant's due process rights were not violated. Follett v. State, 2006 WY 47, 132 P.3d 1155,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 54

(Wyo. 2006), reh'g denied,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 56

(Wyo. May 3, 2006).

Constitutional rights are violated by counsel's failure toinvestigate mental illness defense. —

In an arson case, counsel was ineffective for failing to properly investigate the petitioner's mental history for a possible insanity defense before trial where counsel was aware of a bipolar diagnosis, did not obtain medical records for review, and did not consult with a mental health professional nor obtain an opinion about the petitioner's mental state at the time of the offense. Counsel's failure to properly investigate the matter and make an insanity plea appeared to have deprived the petitioner of the only true defense available to him, and it had a reasonable likelihood of success. Keats v. State, 2005 WY 81, 115 P.3d 1110,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 2005).

Evidence of involuntary intoxication properly excluded. —

Trial court did not err under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 7-11-304(a) in not allowing defendant to present evidence of involuntary intoxication as part of the defense; defendant had withdrawn a not guilty by reason of mental illness plea and was therefore legitimately prohibited from introducing evidence of involuntary intoxication for the purposes of proving that defendant lacked the mental capacity to commit the crimes.
Poitra v. State, 2012 WY 58, 275 P.3d 478,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 61

(Wyo. 2012).

Trial court did not err in declining to admit defendant's statementson the grounds that they were the product of intoxication. —

The trial court did not err in declining to admit defendant's statements on the grounds that they were involuntary due to intoxication where the evidence showed that even though the defendant exhibited symptoms consistent with methamphetamine-induced intoxication and admitted methamphetamine use that same day, he appeared to understand the questions asked of him and answered them appropriately. Gordon v. State, 2004 WY 105, 97 P.3d 64,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(Wyo. 2004).

Furnishing of examination reports to jury. —

There is no requirement in §

7-11-305

for the furnishing to a jury of a report of the result of the examinations conducted by the various experts, as to the defendant's competency, except insofar as testimony may be presented under the provisions of this section and §

7-11-303

.Hayes v. State, 599 P.2d 558,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 443

(Wyo. 1979).

Insanity instruction requires causative element. —

A defect in a proposed instruction on the defense of insanity is clear where it does not contain the necessary causative element of mental illness or mental deficiency and no construction is possible to save the omission. Schwager v. State, 589 P.2d 1303,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 359

(Wyo. 1979).

Defendant's right to speedy trial. —

Defendant's right to a speedy trial was not violated because, calculating the days from October 21, 2004, the date defendant first raised the issue of his mental illness, to June 7, 2005, the date the district court finally resolved the issue once and for all, 230 days elapsed. Of the total 337 days of delay, those 230 were excludable under Wyo. R. Crim. P. 48, thus resulting in a remainder of 107 days; that 107 being well under the 180-day limit of Rule 48.
Potter v. State, 2007 WY 83, 158 P.3d 656,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 90

(Wyo. 2007).

Applied

in

Dodge v. State, 562 P.2d 303,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 243

(Wyo. 1977); Polston v. State, 685 P.2d 1,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 297

(Wyo. 1984); Pote v. State, 695 P.2d 617,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 445

(Wyo. 1985).

Quoted

in

Engle v. State, 774 P.2d 1303,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 138

(Wyo. 1989); Price v. State, 807 P.2d 909,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1991); McGinn v. State, 928 P.2d 1157,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 166

(Wyo. 1996).

Cited

in

Fulcher v. State, 633 P.2d 142,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 369

(Wyo. 1981);
Sincock v. State, 2003 WY 115, 76 P.3d 323,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 135

(Wyo. 2003);
Hannon v. State, 2004 WY 8, 84 P.3d 320,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(2004);
Hauck v. State, 2007 WY 113, 162 P.3d 512,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(July 18, 2007); Osborne v. State, 2012 WY 123,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 129

(Sept 13, 2012).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Insanity, Bifurcation and Due Process: Can Values Survive Doctrine,” see XIII Land & Water L. Rev. 515 (1978).

For article, “The Greatest Lawyer in the World (The Maturing of Janice Walker),” see XIV Land & Water L. Rev. 135 (1979).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part one), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 107 (1984).

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity and construction of statutes providing for psychiatric examination of accused to determine mental condition, 32 ALR2d 434.

Admissibility of results of computer analysis of defendant's mental state, 37 ALR4th 510.

Adequacy of defense counsel's representation of criminal client — issues of incompetency, 70 ALR5th 1.

Adequacy of defense counsel's representation of criminal client — pretrial conduct or conduct at unspecified time regarding issues of insanity, 72 ALR5th 109.

Adequacy of defense counsel's representation of criminal client — conduct occurring at time of trial regarding issues of diminished capacity, intoxication, and unconsciousness, 78 ALR5th 197.

Adequacy of defense counsel's representation of criminal client — pretrial conduct or conduct at unspecified time regarding issues of diminished capacity, intoxication, and unconsciousness, 79 ALR5th 419.

Competency to stand trial of criminal defendant diagnosed as “schizophrenic” — modern federal cases, 63 ALR Fed 696.

Construction and application of 18 USCS § 17, providing for insanity defense in federal criminal prosecutions, 118 ALR Fed 265.

§ 7-11-305.
Pleas of not guilty and not guilty by reason of mental illness or deficiency; burden of proof; expert witnesses.

When a defendant couples a plea of not guilty with a plea of not guilty by reason of mental illness or deficiency, proof shall be submitted before the same jury in a continuous trial on whether the defendant in fact committed the acts charged, on the remaining elements of the alleged criminal offense and on the issue of mental responsibility of the defendant. In addition to other forms of verdict submitted to the jury, the court shall submit a verdict by which the jury may find the defendant not guilty by reason of mental illness or deficiency excluding responsibility.

The prosecution shall prove beyond a reasonable doubt all the elements of the offense charged. Every defendant is presumed to be mentally responsible. The defendant shall have the burden of going forward and proving by the greater weight of evidence that, as a result of mental illness or deficiency, he lacked capacity either to appreciate the wrongfulness of his conduct or to conform his conduct to the requirements of the law.

Only the designated examiners who examined the defendant pursuant to W.S.

7-11-303

or

7-11-304

are competent witnesses to testify as to the defendant’s mental responsibility.

In addition, the state and the defendant may summon other expert witnesses who did not examine the defendant. Such experts are not competent to testify as to the mental responsibility of the defendant; however, they may testify as to the validity of the procedures followed and the general scientific propositions stated by other witnesses.

The designated examiner who examined the defendant may testify as to and explain the nature of his examinations, his diagnosis of mental illness or deficiency of the defendant, and his opinion as to the defendant’s ability to appreciate the wrongfulness of his conduct or to conform his conduct to the requirements of law. The designated examiner may be cross-examined as to his competence and the credibility of his diagnosis and his opinion.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 191, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 7-242.5; Laws 1978, ch. 3, § 1; 1983, ch. 179, § 1; 1985, ch. 147, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to opinions and expert testimony, see Rules 701 through 706, W.R.E.

Editor's note. —

Any pre-1975 annotations are taken from cases decided under prior law.

Bifurcated trial procedure unconstitutional. —

The bifurcated trial procedure for the adjudication of guilt and insanity under subsection (a) as it existed prior to the 1978 amendment was violative of a defendant's right to due process. Sanchez v. State, 567 P.2d 270,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 309

(Wyo. 1977).

Sanchez decision to be retroactively applied. —

The decision in Sanchez v. State, 567 P.2d 270,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 309

(Wyo. 1977).

Defendant prejudiced by application of wrong versions of statutes. —

The defendant, who committed certain offenses prior to July 1, 1983, was, nevertheless, tried under §

7-11-304

and this section, relating to mental illness or deficiency, as they existed after their 1983 amendments, effective July 1, 1983. The defendant's psychiatric witness testified that the defendant could not resist his impulses at the time of the incidents in question, which was sufficient, under pre-1983 §

7-11-304

(a), to relieve a person of responsibility for criminal conduct. The defendant was prejudiced by the court failing to give an instruction under the pre-1983 version of subsection (b), under which the state had the obligation to prove beyond a reasonable doubt that the defendant was able to “conform his conduct to the requirements of the law,” as defined in pre-1983 § 7-11-304(a), and by, instead, giving an instruction under the post-1983 version of subsection (b), under which the burden was shifted to the defendant to prove that he could not “conform his conduct to the conduct of the law,” as now defined in § 7-11-304(a) to exclude the “irresistible impulse” test. Lewis v. State, 709 P.2d 1278,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 619

(Wyo. 1985).

Submission of mental deficiency issue to jury requires some evidence. —

In the absence of evidence submitted by a defendant in a criminal proceeding tending to establish mental illness or deficiency a district court should not, despite the language of this section, submit such an issue to the jury simply on the basis of a plea of not guilty by reason of mental illness or deficiency. Kind v. State, 595 P.2d 960,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 425

(Wyo. 1979) (decided prior to 1983 amendment).

And mental responsibility issue not submitted by instruction on criminal carelessness. —

Where the jury was advised that it could consider the mental capacity of the defendant in considering whether there was culpable neglect or criminal carelessness, but, where this instruction did not in any way require proof of the additional element of mental responsibility by the prosecution, such an issue was not submitted. Kind v. State, 595 P.2d 960,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 425

(Wyo. 1979) (decided prior to 1983 amendment).

Furnishing of examination report to jury. —

There is no requirement in this section for the furnishing to a jury of a report of the result of the examinations conducted by the various experts, as to the defendant's competency, except insofar as testimony may be presented under the provisions of §§

7-11-303

and

7-11-304

.Hayes v. State, 599 P.2d 558,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 443

(Wyo. 1979).

Any examiner who examined accused is competent witness,

as to the defendant's competency, and his testimony is not limited only to that proper for an expert who did not examine the accused. Hayes v. State, 599 P.2d 558,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 443

(Wyo. 1979).

Limitations of witnesses valid. —

To accept defendant's contention that this section arbitrarily limited the number of witnesses permitted to give expert testimony on the main and controlling fact of the mental responsibility of the defendant would bring into contention its propriety in the interest of a fair trial and due process and also question the inherent power of the court with reference to limitation of the number of witnesses, thus invalidating the section. Hayes v. State, 599 P.2d 558,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 443

(Wyo. 1979).

It is improper for juries to arbitrarily disregard expert testimony

of psychiatric opinion. Reilly v. State, 496 P.2d 899,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 248

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 498 P.2d 1236,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 261

(Wyo. 1972).

Validity of expert opinions depends on observation. —

Opinions of experts must depend for their validity upon the facts and chances for observation had by the experts for reasons upon which they are based. Reilly v. State, 496 P.2d 899,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 248

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 498 P.2d 1236,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 261

(Wyo. 1972).

Testimony of lay witnesses. —

Although the testimony of lay witnesses may be competent evidence on the issue of sanity, it does not follow that, in the face of a substantial showing of insanity, the government may send the issue to the jury simply by having two policemen testify, “He looked all right to me.” Reilly v. State, 496 P.2d 899,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 248

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 498 P.2d 1236,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 261

(Wyo. 1972).

Characterization of a defendant's conduct as normal must be taken as measured on the standard of people generally. The acquaintance and time of observation by lay witnesses is of much importance. Reilly v. State, 496 P.2d 899,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 248

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 498 P.2d 1236,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 261

(Wyo. 1972).

Prosecutorial rebuttal by lay witness or non-examining psychiatrist may raise jury issue. —

If reasonable minds could not differ on the defendant's insanity, then that issue should not be submitted to the jury, and a directed verdict of acquittal should be entered, but a court should not grant an acquittal solely because the prosecution fails to produce an examining psychiatrist to rebut the testimony of the defendant's psychiatrists. Under some circumstances, rebuttal by a lay witness or a non-examining psychiatrist may be sufficient to make the defendant's sanity a question for the jury. State v. Zespy, 723 P.2d 564,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 600

(Wyo. 1986) (decided prior to 1983 amendment).

Non-examining psychiatrist may attack psychiatric tests as a group. —

A non-examining psychiatrist's rebuttal testimony that there are no psychiatric tests upon which a psychiatrist can base a valid opinion about a defendant's sanity should have been permitted. State v. Zespy, 723 P.2d 564,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 600

(Wyo. 1986).

Refusing to allow defendant to question the state medical witness

as to the compensation he received from the county for testifying as to sanity of the defendant is not an abuse of the trial court's discretion. State v. Riggle, 76 Wyo. 1, 298 P.2d 349,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1956).

Standard of review.—

Standard in reviewing a defense of not guilty by reason of mental illness or defect was whether, after reviewing the evidence in the light most favorable to the State, a rational trier of fact could have found defendant failed to prove the defense by a preponderance of the evidence because Wyoming’s statutory scheme placed the burden on the defendant to prove he or she was not mentally responsible for his or her crimes and required him or her to carry his or her burden by the greater weight of evidence. Gabbert v. State, 2018 WY 69, 420 P.3d 172,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 72

(Wyo. 2018).

Defense not proved.—

Defendant did not meet defendant’s burden to prove a defense of not guilty by reason of mental illness or defect because (1) the only testifying expert said defendant knew defendant’s conduct was wrong and could conform that conduct to the law, and (2) other evidence showed defendant knew defendant’s acts were illegal by showing defendant knew defendant had violated parole and the police and defendant’s parole agent were looking for defendant, as defendant ran from the police and lied to the parole agent. Gabbert v. State, 2018 WY 69, 420 P.3d 172,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 72

(Wyo. 2018).

Evidence discrediting expert not grounds for new trial. —

Where state's doctor testified that defendant was sane but that he could not remember the exact date on which he examined the defendant but that he thought it was two days before defendant's discharge on April 12, the defendant was not entitled to a new trial on the ground of newly discovered evidence that the doctor was elsewhere on April 10, such evidence having no other effect than discrediting the testimony of the witness. State v. Spears, 76 Wyo. 82, 300 P.2d 551,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1956).

Ineffective assistance of counsel. —

Defendant's counsel was not ineffective under Wyo. Const. art. 1, § 10 for not raising the defense of not guilty by reason of mental illness or deficiency where nothing in the record indicated other than that defendant consented to the trial strategy of admitting to shooting victims to avoid the death penalty or to reduce culpability for the sentencing phase. Olsen v. State, 2003 WY 46, 67 P.3d 536,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 57

(Wyo. 2003).

Not error to instruct jury “every defendant is presumed to be mentally responsible.” —

It was not error for the court to instruct the jury that “every defendant is presumed to be mentally responsible.” The jury could not have thought that such a presumption was conclusive, as other portions of the instruction discussed circumstances when a person is not legally responsible for his conduct, and that the defendant must prove by a greater weight of the evidence his lack of mental responsibility. Brooks v. State, 706 P.2d 664,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 564

(Wyo. 1985).

And constitutional to require accused to prove affirmative defense of mental illness. —

Requiring the accused to prove the affirmative defense of mental illness or deficiency did not constitute a shifting of the burden of proof to the accused to disprove an essential element of the crime charged. Mental responsibility is not an element of the offense, but a deficiency thereof is an affirmative defense which relieves the accused of responsibility. Brooks v. State, 706 P.2d 664,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 564

(Wyo. 1985).

Applied

in

Dodge v. State, 562 P.2d 303,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 243

(Wyo. 1977); Henriksen v. State, 575 P.2d 754,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 271

(Wyo. 1978).

Quoted

in

Polston v. State, 685 P.2d 1,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 297

(Wyo. 1984); Miller v. State, 755 P.2d 855,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 56

(Wyo. 1988); Shipman v. State, 2001 WY 11, 17 P.3d 34,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 2001).

Cited

in

Engle v. State, 821 P.2d 1285,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 180

(Wyo. 1991); Reiter v. State, 2001 WY 116, 36 P.3d 586,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 2001); Smith v. State, 2008 WY 98, 190 P.3d 522,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 101

(Aug. 19, 2008).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Insanity, Bifurcation and Due Process: Can Values Survive Doctrine,” see XIII Land & Water L. Rev. 515 (1978).

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Necessity or propriety of bifurcated criminal trial on issue of insanity defense, 1 ALR4th 884.

Propriety of questioning expert witness regarding specific incidents or allegations of expert's unprofessional conduct or professional negligence, 11 ALR5th 1.

Adequacy of defense counsel's representation of criminal client — issues of incompetency, 70 ALR5th 1.

Adequacy of defense counsel's representation of criminal client — pretrial conduct or conduct at unspecified time regarding issues of insanity, 72 ALR5th 109.

§ 7-11-306.
Disposition of persons found not guilty by reason of mental illness or deficiency excluding responsibility.

After entry of a judgment of not guilty by reason of mental illness or deficiency excluding responsibility, the court shall, on the basis of evidence given at trial or at a separate hearing, make an order as provided in subsection (b), (c) or (d) of this section.

If the court finds that the person is no longer affected by mental illness or deficiency, or that he no longer presents a substantial risk of danger to himself or others and is not in need of care, supervision or treatment, the court shall order him discharged from custody.

If the court finds that the person is affected by mental illness or deficiency and presents a substantial risk of danger to himself or others, but can be controlled adequately and given proper care, supervision and treatment if released on supervision, the court shall order him released subject to the supervisory orders of the court as are appropriate in the interests of justice and the welfare of the defendant. The court may appoint any person or state, county or local agency which the court considers capable of supervising the person upon release. Upon receipt of an order issued under this subsection, the person or agency appointed shall assume the supervision of the person pursuant to the direction of the court. Conditions of release in the order of the court may be modified from time to time and supervision may be terminated by order of the court. If upon a hearing the state shows by a preponderance of the evidence that the person released on supervision under this subsection can no longer be controlled adequately by supervision, the court may order the person committed to the Wyoming state hospital or other designated facility for custody, care and treatment.

If the court finds that the person is affected by mental illness or deficiency and presents substantial risk of danger to himself or others and that he is not a proper subject for release or supervision, the court shall order him committed to the Wyoming state hospital or other designated facility for custody, care and treatment.

Following the first ninety (90) days of commitment to the Wyoming state hospital or other designated facility under this section, if at any time the head of the facility is of the opinion that the person is no longer affected by mental illness or deficiency, or that he no longer presents a substantial risk of danger to himself or others, the head of the facility shall apply to the court which committed the person for an order of discharge. The application shall be accompanied by a report setting forth the facts supporting the opinion of the head of the facility. Copies of the application and report shall be transmitted by the clerk of the court to the district attorney. The court shall hold a hearing on this matter as soon as possible. If the state opposes the recommendation of the head of the facility, the state has the burden of proof by a preponderance of the evidence to show that the person continues to be affected by mental illness or deficiency and continues to present a substantial risk of danger to himself or others and should remain in the custody of the designated facility.

Ninety (90) days after the order of commitment, any person committed to the designated facility under this section may apply to the district court of the county from which he was committed for an order of discharge upon the grounds that he is no longer affected by mental illness or deficiency, or that he no longer presents a substantial risk of danger to himself or others. The application for discharge shall be accompanied by a report of the head of the facility which shall be prepared and transmitted as provided in subsection (e) of this section. The court shall hold a hearing on this matter as soon as possible. The applicant shall prove by a preponderance of the evidence his fitness for discharge. An application for an order of discharge under this subsection filed within six (6) months of the date of a previous hearing shall be subject to summary disposition by the court.

If the court, after a hearing upon any application for discharge, or application for modification or termination of release on supervision, under subsections (c) through (f) of this section, finds that the person is no longer affected by mental illness or deficiency, or that he no longer presents a substantial risk of danger to himself or others, the court shall order him discharged from custody or from supervision. If the court finds that the person is still affected by a mental illness or deficiency and presents a substantial risk of danger to himself or others, but can be controlled adequately if he is released on supervision, the court shall order him released on supervision as provided in subsection (c) of this section. If the court finds that the person has not recovered from his mental illness or deficiency and presents a substantial risk of danger to himself or others and cannot adequately be controlled if he is released on supervision, the court shall order him remanded for continued care and treatment.

In any hearing under this section the court may appoint one (1) or more designated examiners to examine the person and submit reports to the court. Reports filed with the court shall include, but need not be limited to, an opinion as to the mental condition of the person and whether the person presents a substantial risk of danger to himself or others. To facilitate examination, the court may order the person placed in the temporary custody of any designated facility. If neither the district attorney nor the defendant or his counsel, if any, contests the findings of the report filed with the court, the court may make the determination on the basis of the report filed with the court. If the report is contested, the court shall hold a hearing on the issue. If the report is received in evidence at the hearing, the party who contests the report has the right to summon and to cross-examine the examiners who submitted the report and to offer evidence upon the issue. Other evidence regarding the person’s mental condition may be introduced by either party.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 191, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 7-242.6; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; 1985, ch. 147, § 2; 2005, ch. 114, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (e) and (f), inserted “The court shall hold a hearing on this matter as soon as possible.”

Disposal after guilt determination may not be injected into criminal trial. —

It would be improper to inject into the trial of a criminal case the issue of defendant's disposal after his guilt or innocence has been determined. Lonquest v. State, 495 P.2d 575,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 242

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 409 U.S. 1006, 93 S. Ct. 432, 34 L. Ed. 2d 299, 1972 U.S. LEXIS 639 (U.S. 1972).

Criminal acquittee must remain both mentally ill and dangerous. —

Subsections (f) and (g) are consistent with the United States Supreme Court's core holding in

Foucha v. Louisiana,

in that a Wyoming “criminal acquittee” must be released if he proves, by a preponderance of the evidence, that he is no longer affected by mental illness or deficiency, or that he no longer presents a substantial risk of danger to himself or others and is not a proper subject for release or supervision. In other words, a “criminal acquittee” cannot be detained indefinitely unless he remains both mentally ill and dangerous, not dangerous alone. Reiter v. State, 2001 WY 116, 36 P.3d 586,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 2001).

Criminal acquittees are dissimilar to civil acquittees for equal protection purposes. —

A criminal acquittee has placed his mental illness at issue, proved it by a preponderance of the evidence, and is deemed to have committed a criminal act. Such important differences render a criminal acquittee dissimilar to a civil committee for equal protection purposes. Reiter v. State, 2001 WY 116, 36 P.3d 586,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 2001).

Burden of proof for discharge. —

Requiring a criminal acquittee to rebut the inference or presumption of continuing mental illness and dangerousness by a preponderance of the evidence in a discharge proceeding under subsection (f) does not violate a criminal acquittee's state or federal due process guarantees. Reiter v. State, 2001 WY 116, 36 P.3d 586,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 2001).

Denial of application for discharge. —

Court affirmed an order denying an application for conditional discharge from the Wyoming State Hospital (WSH); WSH amended its application for conditional discharge because it still considered defendant to be a danger to himself or others, and defendant presented no evidence to the contrary. CLC v. State, 2004 WY 2, 82 P.3d 1235,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 2004).

Jurisdiction not given to court to sentence person to state hospital. —

Jurisdiction has not been given to the trial court to sentence a person to the Wyoming state hospital as part of the penalty for criminal activity. Dean v. State, 668 P.2d 639,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 354

(Wyo. 1983).

Applied

in

Polston v. State, 685 P.2d 1,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 297

(Wyo. 1984).

Quoted

in

Fulcher v. State, 633 P.2d 142,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 369

(Wyo. 1981).

Cited

in

Hayes v. State, 599 P.2d 558,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 443

(Wyo. 1979);State v. Wyo. State Hosp. (In re RB), 2013 WY 15,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Feb 6, 2013).

State v. Wyo. State Hosp. (In re RB), 2013 WY 15,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Feb 6, 2013) .

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Greatest Lawyer in the World (The Maturing of Janice Walker),” see XIV Land & Water L. Rev. 135 (1979).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity of conditions imposed when releasing person committed to institution as consequence of acquittal of crime on ground of insanity, 2 ALR4th 934.

§ 7-11-307.
Treatment of defendant committed to state hospital.

In all cases in which the defendant is committed to the Wyoming state hospital under the provisions of this act, the defendant shall be received and treated in the same manner as all other persons committed to the institution and be subject to the same rules and regulations. Due caution shall be exercised to prevent the escape of the defendant.

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 83, § 5; C.S. 1945, § 10-905; Laws 1951, ch. 87, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 7-243; Laws 1985, ch. 147, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the first sentence, see § 7-11-301(a)(iv).

Cited

in

C.L.C. v. State, 2004 WY 2, 82 P.3d 1235,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 2004).